apertium-es-gl.es.dix
<pardef n="agrade/cer__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ceríamos</l>  <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cería</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ceríais</l>   <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cerías</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cerían</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cería</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ceremos</l>   <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ceré</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ceréis</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cerás</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cerán</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cerá</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciéremos</l>  <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciere</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciereis</l>   <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cieres</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cieren</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciere</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciendo</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciéndo</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabiéndo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cimos</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cí</l>        <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cisteis</l>   <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciste</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cieron</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ció</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ced</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><p><l>os</l><r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ced</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabed"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cé</l>        <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabé"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>céd</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabéd"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cer</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cer</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__saber"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cér</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabér"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cíamos</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cía</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cíais</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cías</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cían</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cía</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciéramos</l>  <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ciésemos</l>  <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciera</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ciese</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cierais</l>   <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>cieseis</l>   <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cieras</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>cieses</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cieran</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ciesen</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciera</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ciese</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cidas</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cida</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cidos</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cido</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cemos</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zco</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>céis</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ces</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cen</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zcamos</l>    <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zca</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zcáis</l>     <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zcas</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zcan</l>      <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zca</l>       <r>cer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="abastecer"><i>abaste</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="acaecer"><i>acae</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="acontecer"><i>aconte</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="adolecer"><i>adole</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="adormecer"><i>adorme</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="agradecer"><i>agrade</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="amanecer"><i>amane</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="anochecer"><i>anoche</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="aparecer"><i>apare</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="apetecer"><i>apete</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="atardecer"><i>atarde</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="carecer"><i>care</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="comparecer"><i>compare</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="crecer"><i>cre</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="decrecer"><i>decre</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desaparecer"><i>desapare</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desobedecer"><i>desobede</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desvanecer"><i>desvane</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="embellecer"><i>embelle</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enaltecer"><i>enalte</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="encarecer"><i>encare</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="endurecer"><i>endure</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enloquecer"><i>enloque</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enriquecer"><i>enrique</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enrojecer"><i>enroje</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="entorpecer"><i>entorpe</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="envejecer"><i>enveje</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="esclarecer"><i>esclare</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="establecer"><i>estable</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="estremecer"><i>estreme</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fallecer"><i>falle</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="favorecer"><i>favore</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fenecer"><i>fene</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="florecer"><i>flore</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fortalecer"><i>fortale</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="guarecer"><i>guare</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="guarnecer"><i>guarne</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="humedecer"><i>humede</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="merecer"><i>mere</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="obedecer"><i>obede</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ofrecer"><i>ofre</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="oscurecer"><i>oscure</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="padecer"><i>pade</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="parecer"><i>pare</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="perecer"><i>pere</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="permanecer"><i>permane</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pertenecer"><i>pertene</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prevalecer"><i>prevale</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reaparecer"><i>reapare</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rejuvenecer"><i>rejuvene</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="restablecer"><i>restable</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="subyacer"><i>subya</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="yacer"><i>ya</i><par n="agrade/cer__vblex"/></e>
